test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-tiettid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - tiettiđ: # ML checked

    tiettiđ+V+Inf: tiettiđ
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: tiettuđ
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiettuum
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tiettuuh
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiättoo
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tiättojeen
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tiettuuvettee
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tiettuv
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tiettup
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tiettuuvetteđ
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tiättojeh
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tiättojim
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tiättojih
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tiettui
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tiettuim
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tiettuid
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tiettuin
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tiettuim
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tiettuid
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tiättojii
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tiettuuččim
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: tiettuuččih
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tiettuuččij
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: tiettuuččáim
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: tiettuuččáid
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: tiettuuččáin
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: tiettuuččijm
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: tiettuuččijd
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: tiettuuččii
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tiettuužeem
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: tiettuužeeh
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tietuš
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tiettuužeen
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: tiettušvettee
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tiettuužává
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tiettuužep
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: tiettušvetteđ
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tiettuužeh
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tiettuu
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tiettum
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: tiettuuččii
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tiettuužii
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: tiettojeijee
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: tiettum
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: tiettum
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: tiettuumin
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: tiettuumist
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: tiettuumân
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: tiettuudijn
    tiettiđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: tiettuuhánnáá
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tieđâdâm
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tieđâdah
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tieđâd
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tieđâdeen
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tieđâdvettee
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tieđâdává
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tieđâdeh
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tieđâd
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tieđâdim
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tieđâdij
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tieđâdii
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: tieđâdiččim
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: tieđâdičij
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: tieđâdižžeem
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tieđâdiš
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tieđâd
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tieđâdâm
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: tieđâdižžii
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: tieđâdâm
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: tieđâdhennáá
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: tieđâdhinnáá
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: tieđâdhánnáá
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: tieđâdem
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: tieđâdmân
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: tieđâdmin
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: tieđâdmist
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: tieđâddijn
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: tieđâddijnân
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: tieđâddijnâd
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: tieđâddijnis
    tiettiđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: tieđâddijn
    tiettiđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tieđistâm
    tiettiđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tieđettâm
    tiettiđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tieđiškuáđám
    tiettiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tietâlâm
    tiettiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiettâl
    tiettiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tietâleen
    tiettiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tietâleh
    tiettiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tiettâl
    tiettiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tietâlim
    tiettiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tietâlij
    tiettiđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tietâlii
